South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "In Vitro Fertilization Act." SECTION 2.  Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 140 Assistive Reproductive Technologies Protection Section 44-140-10. For purposes of this chapter, "assistive reproductive technologies" means treatments or procedures that involve the handling of human egg, sperm, and embryo outside the body with the intent of facilitating a pregnancy. Assistive reproductive technologies include, but are not limited to, in vitro fertilization, egg, embryo, or sperm cryopreservation, egg or embryo donation, and gestational surrogacy. Section 44-140-20. It is the public policy of this State to protect and promote equitable access to the full range of assistive reproductive technologies. Any undue burden placed on a person seeking to utilize assistive reproductive technologies is a violation of this section. Section 44-140-30. Practitioners of assistive reproductive technologies are not required to preserve eggs, sperm, or a fertilized human embryo outside the human body. However, a patient, after consultation with a practitioner, may choose to preserve eggs, sperm, or a fertilized human embryo outside the human body. If the patient chooses to preserve eggs, sperm, or a fertilized human embryo outside the human body, then the practitioner must provide for appropriate preservation in accordance with generally accepted medical standards. SECTION 3.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-100.  Any fertilized human egg or human embryo that exists in any form outside of the uterus of a human body shall not, under any circumstance, be considered an unborn child, a minor child, an unborn person, an unborn fetus, a natural person, or any other term that connotes a human being for any purpose under state law including, but not limited, under any provision of Chapter 3, Title 16 or Chapter 41, Title 44. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----